Alabama, session 2026rs, SB301.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. There is established a new voting center in
Perry County to serve the voters of Districts 1, 2, 3, and 4.
The new voting center shall be located at the new National
Guard Armory building, 620 Magnolia Street, Marion, Alabama
36756.
Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 1

Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
SB301 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB301
Senate 24-Feb-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Passed: 26-Feb-26




By: Senator Stewart
Page 2